Hawaii, session 2026, SB2330.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The Hawaii Revised Statutes is amended by adding a new chapter to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Chapter microfiber filtration systems in washing machines §   -A Definitions.  As used in this chapter: "Department" means the department of health. "Microfiber filtration system" means a filtration system that: (1)  Is active across all washing cycles of a washing machine; (2)  Contains a microfiber filter that: (A)  Has a mesh size of 100 micrometers or less; or (B)  Meets another standard as determined by the department to provide equal or greater efficacy in reducing microfiber pollution as compared to a microfiber filter with a mesh size of not greater than 100 micrometers; and (3)  Is either: (A)  Built into a newly manufactured washing machine; or (B)  An in-line filtration system that is packaged with and capable of being installed with a newly manufactured washing machine. "Manufacturer" means any individual, partnership, corporation, association, or other legal relationship that is engaged in the manufacture, assembly, or production of washing machines. "Units sold" means the total number of newly manufactured washing machines that are offered or distributed for sale within the State by a manufacturer, directly or through a retailer, distributor, or other intermediary, including through online or catalog channels, during a given year. "Washing machine" means a machine designed and used for washing clothes and linens and includes residential and commercial washing machines. §   -B  Washing machines; microfiber filtration systems; requirements.  (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), beginning January 1, 2032, no manufacturer shall sell, offer to sell, or cause to be distributed for sale within the State a newly manufactured washing machine that fails to meet the requirements of subsection (d). (b)  For each calendar year, the percentage of newly manufactured washing machines offered or distributed for sale in the State that are equipped with a microfiber filtration system pursuant to subsection (d) shall be as follows: (1)  Beginning January 1, 2032, not less than ten per cent of units sold; (2)  Beginning January 1, 2037, not less than fifty per cent of units sold; and (3)  Beginning January 1, 2042, not less than one hundred per cent of units sold. (c)  Beginning January 1, 2042, no retailer or distributor may sell, offer for sale, or distribute for sale within the State a newly manufactured washing machine that does not meet the requirements of subsection (d). (d)  Except as provided in subsection (b), each newly manufactured washing machine shall: (1)  Be equipped with a microfiber filtration system; (2)  Bear a conspicuous label visible at the point of sale and on the washing machine that: (A)  Notifies consumers that the unit includes a microfiber filtration system; (B)  Instructs consumers to check and clean the filter according to a regular schedule; and (C)  Directs consumers to dispose of captured lint with household solid waste or according to the manufacturer's instructions; and (3)  Include a certificate of compliance stating that the washing machine is complaint with this section. §   -C  Certification; requirements.  (a)  Each manufacturer of a newly manufactured washing machine sold, offered for sale, or caused to be sold or distributed for sale in the State shall certify with the department, in a form and manner as determined by the department, that the manufacturer is in compliance with the requirements of this chapter. (b)  The certificate shall, at a minimum, include: (1)  A description of which units are sold in compliance with section    -B; and (2)  A signed attestation of compliance by an authorized official or agent of the manufacturer. §   -D  Penalties.  (a) Any manufacturer found in violation of this chapter shall be liable for a civil penalty of no more than $10,000 for a first violation and no more than $30,000 for each subsequent violation. (b)  No washing machine distributer or retailer shall be held in violation of this chapter if the distributor or retailer is not the manufacturer of the washing machine and the distributor or retailer relied in good faith on the certificate of compliance provided by the manufacturer pursuant to section    -B. (c)  This section shall not impair any other rights, causes of action, claims, or defenses available under any other law.  The penalties provided under this section shall be considered cumulative with any other remedied provided by law. §   -E  Rules. The department may adopt rules in accordance with chapter 91 for the purposes of this section, including but not limited to: (1)  Establishing certification requirements for manufacturers, including frequency; (2)  Specifying verification methods for the inclusion of microfiber filter systems; (3)  Establishing procedures for calculating and verifying the percentage of compliant units sold; (4)  Establishing standards for microfiber filters; provided that the standard shall provide equal or greater efficacy in reducing microfiber pollution as compared to a microfiber filter with a mesh size of not greater than one hundred micrometers; and (5)  Establishing and providing limited exemptions to the requirements of this chapter for small businesses." SECTION 2.  In codifying the new sections added by section 1 of this Act, the revisor of statutes shall substitute appropriate section numbers for the letters used in designating the new sections in this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________